Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 139.495 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Educational or charitable institution" means[The taxes imposed by this
chapter shall apply to]:
1.[(a)] A resident[,] nonprofit educational or[,] charitable[, or religious]
institution that has[institutions which have] qualified for exemption
from income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code; or[and]
2.[(b)] Any resident, single member limited liability company that is:
a.[1.] Wholly owned and controlled by a resident or nonresident,
nonprofit educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] institution
that[which] has qualified for exemption from income taxation
under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
b.[2.] Disregarded as an entity separate from the resident or nonresident,
nonprofit educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] institution for
federal income tax purposes pursuant to 26 C.F.R. sec. 301.7701-
2; and
(b) "Religious institution" means:
1. A resident nonprofit religious institution that has qualified for
exemption from income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code; or
2. Any resident, single member limited liability company that is:
a. Wholly owned and controlled by a resident or nonresident,
nonprofit religious institution that has qualified for exemption
from income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1135
Revenue Code; and
b. Disregarded as an entity separate from the resident or
nonresident, nonprofit religious institution for federal income
tax purposes pursuant to 26 C.F.R. sec. 301.7701-2.
[as provided in this section.]
(2) (a) For educational or charitable institutions, except as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection, the taxes imposed by this chapter do[Tax does] not
apply to any of the following:
1. Purchases[Sales] of tangible personal property, digital property, or
services made by[to] these institutions[ or limited liability companies
described in subsection (1) of this section], provided the tangible
personal property, digital property, or service is to be used solely in this
state within the educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] function;
2. Sales of food to students in school cafeterias or lunchrooms;
3. Sales by school bookstores of textbooks, workbooks, and other course
materials;
4. Sales by nonprofit, school sponsored clubs and organizations, provided
the[such] sales do not include tickets for athletic events;
5. Sales of admissions, including the sales of admissions to a golf course
when the admission is the result of a fundraising event, by[ nonprofit]
educational or[,] charitable[, or religious] institutions[ described in
subsection (1) of this section]. All other sales of admissions to a golf
course by these institutions are not exempt from tax under this section;
or
6. a. Fundraising event sales made by [nonprofit ]educational or[,]
charitable[, or religious] institutions[ and limited liability
companies described in subsection (1) of this section].
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1135
b. As used in[For the purposes of] this subparagraph, "fundraising
event sales" does not include sales related to the operation of a
retail business, including but not limited to thrift stores,
bookstores, surplus property auctions, recycle and reuse stores, or
any ongoing operations in competition with for-profit retailers.
(b) The exemptions provided in subparagraphs 5. and 6. of paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall not apply to sales generated by or arising at a tourism
development project approved under KRS 148.851 to 148.860.
(3) (a) An educational or charitable[An] institution shall be entitled to a refund
equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax collected on its sale of donated
goods if the refund is used exclusively as reimbursement for capital
construction costs of additional retail locations in this state, provided the
institution:
1.[(a)] Routinely sells donated items;
2.[(b)] Provides job training and employment to individuals with
workplace disadvantages and disabilities;
3.[(c)] Spends at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its annual revenue
on job training, job placement, or other related community services;
4.[(d)] Submits a refund application to the department within sixty (60)
days after the new retail location opens for business; and
5.[(e)] Provides records of capital construction costs for the new retail
location and any other information the department deems necessary to
process the refund.
The maximum refund allowed for any location shall not exceed one million
dollars ($1,000,000).
(b) As used in this subsection, "capital construction cost":
1. Means the cost of construction of any new facilities or the purchase and
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1135
renovation of any existing facilities; and[, but]
2. Does not include the cost of real property other than real property
designated as a brownfield site as defined in KRS 65.680(4).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, refunds under
subsection (3) of this section shall be made directly to the institution. Interest shall
not be allowed or paid on the refund. The department may examine any refund
within four (4) years from the date the refund application is received. Any
overpayment shall be subject to the interest provisions of KRS 131.183 and the
penalty provisions of KRS 131.180.
(5) All other sales made by [nonprofit ]educational or[,] charitable[, or religious]
institutions[ or limited liability companies described in subsection (1) of this
section] are taxable and the tax may be passed on to the purchaser as provided in
KRS 139.210.
(6) For religious institutions, the taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to any of
the following:
(a) Sales of tangible personal property, digital property, or services made by a
religious institution; or
(b) Purchases of tangible personal property, digital property, or services made
by a religious institution, provided the tangible personal property, digital
property, or service is to be used solely in this state within the religious
function.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:11 PM Jacketed